District of Columbia statutes.
8-1041.12

Rules; enforcement.

(a)

(1)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter within one year of February 26, 2015.

(2)

The Mayor may expand the definition of covered electronic equipment to include items exempted in § 8-1041.01(4); provided, that the Mayor shall not do so before January 1, 2018; provided further, that the Mayor shall not include household appliances. Before issuing such a rule, the Mayor shall provide a report and economic analysis to the Council outlining the reasons that expanding the definition is beneficial to the District’s electronics waste diversion activities and will likely result in higher recycling or reuse rates of the electronic equipment that the Mayor proposes to include.

(b)

The Mayor may establish civil penalties or fines to enforce the provisions of this chapter and the regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 126, 61 DCR 9971

History